Oklahoma, session 2025, SB164.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:





Req. No. 1232 Page 1


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 703, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 443, O.S.L. 2024 (3A O.S. Supp. 2024,


Section 703), is amended to read as follows:


Section 703. As used in the Oklahoma Education Lottery Act:


1. “Administrative expenses” means operating expenses,


excluding amounts set aside for prizes, regardless of whether such


prizes are claimed;


2. “Board” means the board of trustees of the Oklahoma Lottery


Commission;


3. “Capital outlay projects” means the acquisition,


construction, installation, modification, renovation, repair,


extension, renewal, replacement, or rehabilitation of land,


interests in land, buildings, structures, facilities, or other


improvements and the acquisition, installation, modification,


renovation, repair, extension, renewal, replacement, rehabilitation,


or furnishing of fixtures, machinery, equipment, computers,


software, laboratories, furniture, textbooks, and reference material


or other property of any nature whatsoever used on, in, or in


connection with educational facilities;


4. “Commission” means the Oklahoma Lottery Commission;


5. “Educational facilities” means land, structures, and


buildings owned or operated by and through the Oklahoma State


Regents for Higher Education, the State Board of Education, the


Oklahoma Department of Career and Technology Education, or by any

Req. No. 1232 Page 2


school district within this state. A public road or highway leading


to an educational facility shall not be considered an educational


facility;


6. “Executive director” means the chief executive officer and


administrator of the Oklahoma Lottery Commission;


7. “Gross proceeds” means all revenue derived from the sale of


lottery tickets or shares and all other monies derived from the


lottery;


8. “Instant ticket” means a lottery ticket that requires the


player to remove a coating to determine if a prize has been won;


9. “Lottery”, “lotteries”, “lottery game”, or “lottery games”


means an activity conducted by the Commission under the Oklahoma


Education Lottery Act through which prizes are awarded or


distributed by chance among persons who have paid for a chance or


other opportunity to receive a prize, including, but not limited to,


instant tickets and on-line online games, but excluding charity


bingo and games conducted pursuant to the Oklahoma Charity Games


Act, poker, blackjack, slot machines, pulltab machines, card games,


dice, dominos, roulette wheels, or other similar forms of gambling,


or electronic or video forms of these gambling activities, or games


where winners are determined by the outcome of a sports contest, or


pari-mutuel betting conducted pursuant to the Oklahoma Horse Racing


Act;



Req. No. 1232 Page 3


10. “Major procurement contract” means any gaming product or


service costing in excess of Twenty-five Thousand Dollars


($25,000.00), including, but not limited to, major advertising


contracts, annuity contracts, prize payment agreements, consulting


services, equipment, tickets, and other products and services unique


to the Oklahoma lottery, but not including materials, supplies,


equipment, and services common to the ordinary operations of the


Commission;


11. “Member” or “members” means a trustee or trustees of the


board of trustees of the Oklahoma Lottery Commission;


12. “Member of a minority” means an individual who is a member


of a race which comprises less than fifty percent (50%) of the total


population of Oklahoma;


13. “Minority business” means any business which is owned by:


a. an individual who is a member of a minority who


reports as the personal income of the individual for


Oklahoma income tax purposes the income of the


business,


b. a partnership in which a majority of the ownership


interest is owned by one or more members of a minority


who report as their personal income for Oklahoma


income tax purposes more than fifty percent (50%) of


the income of the partnership, or



Req. No. 1232 Page 4


c. a corporation organized under the laws of this state


in which a majority of the common stock is owned by


one or more members of a minority who report as their


personal income for Oklahoma income tax purposes more


than fifty percent (50%) of the distributed earnings


of the corporation;


14. “Net proceeds” means all revenue derived from the sale of


lottery tickets or shares and all other monies derived from the


lottery less operating expenses;


15. “On-line “Online games” means a game where tickets or


shares are purchased through a network of computer terminals located


at retail outlets, and such terminals are linked to a central


computer that records the purchases;


16. “Operating expenses” means all costs of doing business,


including, but not limited to, prizes, commissions, and other


compensation paid to retailers, advertising and marketing costs,


personnel costs, capital costs, administration, and operation of the


Commission and the lottery, and other operating costs;


17. “Pari-mutuel betting” means the pari-mutuel system of


wagering as defined in Section 200.1 of this title. Such term shall


not include a lottery game which may be predicated on a horse-racing


scheme that does not involve actual track events or traditional


lottery games which may involve the distribution of winnings by


pools;

Req. No. 1232 Page 5


18. “Person” means any individual, corporation, partnership,


unincorporated association, limited liability company, or other


legal entity;


19. “Retailer” means a person who sells lottery tickets or


shares on behalf of the Commission pursuant to a contract;


20. “Share” means any intangible evidence of participation in a


lottery game;


21. “Sports pools” means any in-person wagering and wagering


conducted on a mobile device on the outcome of sporting events or


other events, other than horse or other animal races;


22. “Sports pools retailer” means any licensed in-person


establishment or Internet-based application that allows for an


individual to wager on sports pools;


23. “Ticket” means any tangible evidence issued by the lottery


to provide participation in a lottery game; and


22. 24. “Vendor” means a person who provides or proposes to


provide goods or services to the Commission pursuant to a major


procurement contract, but does not include an employee of the


Commission, a retailer, or a state agency or instrumentality


thereof. Such term does not include any corporation whose shares


are publicly traded and which is the parent company of the


contracting party in a major procurement contract.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 3A O.S. 2021, Section 709, is


amended to read as follows:

Req. No. 1232 Page 6


Section 709. A. The Oklahoma Lottery Commission shall have any


and all powers necessary or convenient to its usefulness in carrying


out and effectuating the purposes and provisions of the Oklahoma


Education Lottery Act which are not in conflict with the Oklahoma


Constitution and laws of this state including, but not limited to,


the following:


1. To sue and be sued in contract, equity, mandamus, and


similar actions in its own name and to complain and defend in all


courts;


2. To adopt and alter a seal;


3. To hold copyrights, trademarks, and service marks and


enforce its rights with respect thereto;


4. To acquire or lease real property and make improvements


thereon and acquire by lease or by purchase personal property,


including, but not limited to, computers and intangible property,


including, but not limited to, computer programs, systems, and


software;


5. To enter into contracts to incur debt in its own name and


enter into financing agreements with the state, agencies or


instrumentalities of the state, or with any commercial financial


institution or credit provider as provided in Section 732 of this


title;


6. To select and contract with vendors and retailers;



Req. No. 1232 Page 7


7. To enter into contracts or agreements with state or local


law enforcement agencies for the performance of law enforcement,


background investigations, and security checks;


8. To administer oaths, take depositions, issue subpoenas, and


compel the attendance of witnesses and the production of books,


papers, documents, and other evidence relative to any investigation


or proceeding conducted by the Commission;


9. To enter into contracts of any and all types on such terms


and conditions as the Commission may determine;


10. To advertise and promote the lottery and lottery games.


None of the advertisement and promotion for games and products


offered by the Oklahoma Lottery allowed by this paragraph shall


involve children under the age of eighteen (18) in any manner;


11. To inform the public about Oklahoma Lottery Commission


contributions to Oklahoma education programs; and


12. To act as a retailer, to conduct promotions which involve


the dispensing of lottery tickets or shares, and to establish and


operate a sales facility to sell lottery tickets or shares and any


related merchandise.


B. The board of trustees of the Oklahoma Lottery Commission


shall have any and all powers necessary or convenient to its


usefulness in carrying out and effectuating the purposes and


provisions of the Oklahoma Education Lottery Act which are not in



Req. No. 1232 Page 8


conflict with the Oklahoma Constitution and laws of this state


including, but not limited to, the following:


1. To adopt, amend, and repeal policies and procedures and to


promulgate rules for the regulation of its affairs and the conduct


of its business, to prescribe the duties of officers of the board,


and to perform such other duties as may be required by law. In the


promulgation of rules, the board shall be subject to the


Administrative Procedures Act;


2. To procure insurance;


3. To initiate, supervise, and administer the operation of the


lottery in accordance with the provisions of the Oklahoma Education


Lottery Act and rules, policies, and procedures adopted pursuant


thereto;


4. To enter into written agreements with one or more other


states or sovereigns for the operation, participation in marketing,


and promotion of a joint lottery or joint lottery games. Such an


agreement may be entered into with a federally recognized Indian


tribe only if a cooperative agreement authorizing the Commission to


do so has been entered into by the Governor and such a tribe and has


been further approved by the Joint Committee on State-Tribal


Relations pursuant to the provisions of Section 1221 et seq. of


Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes;


5. To direct the executive director to conduct or have


conducted such market research as is necessary or appropriate, which

Req. No. 1232 Page 9


may include an analysis of the demographic characteristics of the


players of each lottery game and an analysis of advertising,


promotion, public relations, incentives, and other aspects of


communication; and


6. To adopt and amend such rules, policies, and procedures as


necessary to implement its powers and duties, organize and operate


the Commission, regulate the conduct of lottery games in general,


and any other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and


effective operation of the lottery or the convenience of the public;


7. To enter into written agreements with one or more other


states or sovereigns for the operation, participation in marketing,


and promotion of sports pools. Such an agreement may be entered


into with a federally recognized Indian tribe for in-person sports


pool games only if a cooperative agreement authorizing the


Commission to do so has been entered into by the Governor and such a


tribe and has been further approved by the Joint Committee on State-


Tribal Relations pursuant to the provisions of Section 1221 et seq.


of Title 74 of the Oklahoma Statutes; and


8. To adopt and amend such rules, policies, and procedures as


necessary to implement its powers and duties, organize and operate


the Commission, regulate the conduct of sports pools in general, and


any other matters necessary or desirable for the efficient and


effective operation of the sports pools or the convenience of the


public.

Req. No. 1232 Page 10


C. The powers enumerated in subsections A and B of this section


are cumulative of and in addition to those powers enumerated


elsewhere in the Oklahoma Education Lottery Act, and no such powers


limit or restrict any other powers of the Oklahoma Lottery


Commission or the board of trustees.


SECTION 3. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 713.1A of Title 3A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


There is hereby created in the State Treasury a fund for the


Oklahoma Lottery Commission to be designated the “Sports Pools


Fund”. The fund shall be a continuing fund, not subject to fiscal


year limitations, and shall consist of all monies received by the


Commission from net revenue received from sports pools wagering and


license fees collected pursuant to Section 4 of this act. All


monies accruing to the credit of the fund shall be appropriated at


the discretion of the Legislature for the purpose of funding


gambling addiction programs, common education, and administrative


costs associated with implementing this act; provided, an


appropriation from the fund no less than One Million Dollars


($1,000,000.00) shall be made to the Department of Mental Health and


Substance Abuse Services for the purpose of treating individuals who


may struggle with gambling addiction.





Req. No. 1232 Page 11


SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 717.1 of Title 3A, unless there


is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. The board of trustees of the Oklahoma Lottery Commission


shall develop a list of objective criteria upon which the


qualification of a licensed sports pools retailer, as defined in


Section 703 of Title 3A of the Oklahoma Statutes, shall be based.


In developing these criteria, the board shall consider such factors


as the financial responsibility of the applicant, security of the


place of business or activity of the applicant, accessibility to the


public, integrity, and reputation. The board shall not consider


political affiliation, activities, or contributions to political


committees or candidates for any public office. The criteria shall


include, but not be limited to, the following:


1. The applicant shall be current in filing all applicable tax


returns and in payment of all taxes, interest, and penalties owed on


state or federal taxes, excluding items under formal appeal pursuant


to applicable statutes;


2. No person, partnership, unincorporated association,


corporation, or other business entity or principal, officer, or


director of a corporation or other business entity shall be selected


as a licensed sports pools retailer who:


a. has been convicted of or is awaiting sentencing on a


plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a criminal

Req. No. 1232 Page 12


offense related to the security or integrity of the


lottery in this or any other jurisdiction,


b. has been convicted of or is awaiting sentencing on a


plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any illegal


gambling activity, false statements, false swearing,


or perjury in this or any other jurisdiction,


c. has been convicted of or is awaiting sentencing on a


plea of guilty or nolo contendere to any crime


punishable by more than one (1) year of imprisonment


or a fine more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00)


or both, unless the civil rights of the person have


been restored and at least five (5) years have elapsed


from the date of the completion of the sentence


without a subsequent conviction of a crime described


in this subparagraph,


d. has been found to have violated the provisions of the


Oklahoma Education Lottery Act or any rule, policy, or


procedure of the Commission unless either ten (10)


years have passed since the violation or the board


finds the violation both minor and unintentional in


nature,


e. is a vendor or any employee or agent of any vendor


doing business with the Commission,



Req. No. 1232 Page 13


f. resides in the same household as the executive


director, any board member, or any employee of the


Commission, or


g. has made a statement of material fact to the


Commission knowing such statement to be false;


3. Any sports pools retailer contract executed pursuant to this


section may, for good cause, be suspended, revoked, or terminated by


the executive director or designee if the retailer is found to have


violated any provisions of the Oklahoma Education Lottery Act or


objective criteria established by the board. Review of such


activities shall be in accordance with the procedures outlined in


the Oklahoma Education Lottery Act and shall not be subject to the


Administrative Procedures Act; and


4. All sports pools retailer contracts may be renewable


annually in the discretion of the Commission unless sooner canceled


or terminated.


B. Licenses issued by the Oklahoma Lottery Commission for


sports pools retailers shall be as follows:


1. For in-person wagering, fifteen percent (15%) of the


adjusted gross revenues received in a calendar year from the play of


sports pools; and


2. For wagering conducted on a mobile device, the following:





Req. No. 1232 Page 14


a. an initial fee of Five Hundred Thousand Dollars


($500,000.00) with an annual fee of One Hundred


Thousand Dollars ($100,000.00), and


b. twenty percent (20%) of the adjusted gross revenues


received in a calendar year from the play of sports


pools.


C. To ensure the financial integrity of sports pools, the


Oklahoma Lottery Commission through its board of trustees shall:


1. Electronically submit annual reports to the Governor, State


Auditor and Inspector, Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation, and


Attorney General, disclosing the total sports pools revenues, prize


disbursements, operating expenses, and administrative expenses of


the Commission. The annual report shall additionally describe the


organizational structure of the Commission and summarize the


functions performed by each organizational division within the


Commission;


2. Adopt a system of internal audits; and


3. Maintain weekly or more frequent records of lottery


transactions, including the distribution of tickets or shares to


retailers, revenues received, claims for prizes, prizes paid, prizes


forfeited, and other financial transactions of the Commission.


D. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 941 through 988


of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes, the conducting of and



Req. No. 1232 Page 15


participation in any game authorized pursuant to this section is


lawful when played pursuant to this section.


E. The board of trustees of the Oklahoma Lottery Commission


shall promulgate any rules necessary for the implementation of


sports pool wagering in this state.


SECTION 5. REPEALER 3A O.S. 2021, Section 735, is hereby


repealed.


SECTION 6. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1232 CAD 12/30/2024 12:21:53 PM





























Req. No. 1232 Page 16